California statutes. Corporations Code
The commissioner may issue a cease and desist order, including an order to take appropriate corrective action, if, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds either of the following:

(a) That any licensee or any subject person of a licensee has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that any licensee or any subject person of a licensee may violate, any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or any provision of any other applicable law.

(b) That any licensee or any subject person of a licensee has engaged or participated in, is engaging or participating in, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that any licensee or any subject person of a licensee may engage or participate in, any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28704.

(a) The commissioner may issue a cease and desist order, including an order to take appropriate corrective action, if the commissioner finds both of the following:

(1) That any of the factors set forth in Section 28703 is true with respect to any licensee or any subject person of a licensee.

(2) That the action or violation is likely to cause the insolvency of, or substantial dissipation of the assets or earnings of, the licensee, or is likely to seriously weaken the condition of the licensee or otherwise to seriously prejudice the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee, prior to the completion of proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 28703.

(b) (1) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any licensee or subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order. The filing of an application for a hearing shall not stay the effectiveness of the order. If the commissioner fails to commence a hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed (or within any longer period to which the licensee or subject person consents), the order shall be deemed rescinded. Upon the completion of the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

(2) The right of any licensee or subject person of a licensee to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the licensee or subject person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28705.

The commissioner may issue an order removing a subject person from that person’s office with the licensee, if any, and prohibiting that person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, if, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds all of the following:

(a) (1) That the subject person of a licensee has violated a provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or any provision of any other applicable law;

(2) That the subject person of a licensee has engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of the licensee; or

(3) That the subject person of a licensee has engaged or participated in any act which constitutes a breach of his or her fiduciary duty as a subject person.

(b) (1) That the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty has caused or is likely to cause substantial financial loss or other damage to the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee; or

(2) That the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty has seriously prejudiced or is likely to seriously prejudice the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee; or

(3) That the subject person has received financial gain by reason of the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty.

(c) That the act, violation, or breach of fiduciary duty either involves dishonesty on the part of the subject person or demonstrates the subject person’s gross negligence with respect to the business of the licensee or a willful disregard for the safety and soundness of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28706.

The commissioner may issue an order removing a subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the commissioner, if the commissioner finds, after notice and a hearing, that the subject person of a licensee has, by engaging or participating in any act with respect to any financial or other business institution which resulted in substantial financial loss or other damage, demonstrated either of the following:

(a) Dishonesty.

(b) Willful or continuing disregard for the safety and soundness of the financial or other business institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28707.

(a) The commissioner may issue an order suspending a subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the consent of the commissioner, if the commissioner finds both of the following:

(1) That the factors set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 28705 or the factors set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 28706 are true with respect to the subject person of a licensee.

(2) That it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee, or for the protection of the public interest that the commissioner immediately suspend the subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibit him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee.

(b) (1) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order. The filing of an application for a hearing shall not stay the effectiveness of the order. If the commissioner fails to begin a hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed (or within any longer period to which the subject person consents), the order shall be deemed rescinded. Upon the completion of the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

(2) The right of any subject person of a licensee to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28708.

(a) The commissioner may issue an order suspending a subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the consent of the commissioner, if the commissioner finds both of the following:

(1) That the subject person of a licensee has been indicted by a grand jury for, or held to answer by a magistrate for, a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust.

(2) That the continuation of that person as a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee, or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee.

(b) The commissioner may issue an order suspending or removing the subject person or former subject person from his or her office, if any, with the licensee and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, except with the prior consent of the commissioner, if the commissioner finds both of the following:

(1) That the subject person or former subject person of a licensee to whom an order was issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or any other subject person of a licensee has been finally convicted of a crime which is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year and which involves dishonesty or breach of trust.

(2) That the continuation or resumption by that person as a subject person of the licensee may threaten the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee, or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee.

(c) (1) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), any subject person of a licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order. If the commissioner fails to commence a hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed (or within any longer period to which the subject person consents), the order shall be deemed rescinded. Upon the completion of the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

(2) The right of any subject person or former subject person of a licensee to whom an order is issued under subdivision (a) or (b) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) The fact that any subject person of a licensee charged with a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust is not finally convicted of the crime shall not preclude the commissioner from issuing an order to the subject person pursuant to any other section of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28709.

Any person to whom an order is issued under Section 28705, 28706, 28707, or 28708 may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order. The commissioner shall not grant the application unless the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person will, if and when he or she becomes a subject person of a licensee, comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28710.

The commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the license of a licensee, if, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) That the licensee or any controlling person or affiliate of the licensee has violated any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or any provision of any other applicable law.

(b) That the licensee is conducting its business in an unsafe and unsound manner.

(c) That the licensee is in a condition that it is unsafe or unsound for it to transact business.

(d) That the licensee has ceased to transact business as a capital access company.

(e) That the licensee is insolvent.

(f) That the licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due.

(g) That the licensee is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy or has sought other similar relief under any other bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any of that relief under any of those laws against any licensee and the licensee has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to the action or the relief has been granted.

(h) That any fact or condition
 exists which, if it had existed at the time when any licensee applied for its license, would have been grounds for denying the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 31.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

28711.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 28710 is true with respect to any licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the public interest that the commissioner immediately suspend or revoke the license of the licensee, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking the license of the licensee.

(b) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), any licensee to whom the order is directed may file with the commissioner a request for a hearing on the order. If the commissioner fails to commence a hearing within 15 business days after the request is filed (or within any longer period to which the licensee consents), the order shall be deemed rescinded. Upon the completion of the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

28712.

Any person whose license is suspended or revoked shall immediately deliver the license to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28713.

Any person to whom an order is issued under Section 28709 or 28710 may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order.

The commissioner shall not grant the application unless the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person will, if and when it becomes a licensee, comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28714.

(a) If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 28709 is true with respect to any licensee and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the licensee or the accredited investors of the licensee, or for the protection of the public interest that the commissioner take immediate possession of the property and business of the licensee, the commissioner may forthwith take possession of the property and business of the licensee and retain possession until the licensee resumes business or is finally liquidated. The licensee may, with the consent of the commissioner, resume business upon any conditions that the commissioner may prescribe.

(b) Whenever the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to subdivision (a), the licensee may apply within 10 days to the superior court in the county in which the head office of the licensee is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and order the commissioner to surrender the property and business of the licensee to the licensee or make any further order that may be just.

(c) An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the superior court by the commissioner or by the licensee in the manner provided by law for appeals from the judgment of a superior court. An appeal from the judgment of the superior court shall operate as a stay of the judgment. No bond need be given if the appeal is taken by the commissioner, but if the appeal is taken by the licensee, a bond shall be given as required by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Whenever the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a licensee pursuant to subdivision (a), the commissioner shall conserve or liquidate the property and business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28715.

Sections 11041, 11042, and 11043 of the Government Code do not apply to the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 88.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

28716.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Crimes and Criminal Penalties [28800. - 28881.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [28800. - 28802.]

28800.

It shall be unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any application, report, or other document filed with the commissioner under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, or willfully to omit to state in any application, report or other document filed with the commissioner under this division any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28801.

It shall be unlawful for any person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or other records of a licensee willfully to refuse to allow the commissioner, upon request, to inspect or make copies of any of those books, accounts, or other records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28802.

It shall be unlawful for any person, with intent to deceive any director, officer, employee, auditor, or attorney of a licensee, the commissioner or any governmental agency, to make any false entry in any of the books, accounts or other records of the licensee, to omit to make any entry in those books, accounts or other records which the person is required to make, or to alter, conceal, or destroy any of those books, accounts, or other records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conflicts of Interest [28820. - 28821.]

28820.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) (1) “Associate,” when used with respect to a licensee, means all of the following:

(A) Any principal shareholder, director, officer, manager, agent, or adviser of the licensee.

(B) Any director, officer, partner, general manager, agent, employer, or employee of any person referred to in subparagraph (A).

(C) Any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any person referred to in subparagraph (A), directly or indirectly,
 through one or more intermediaries.

(D) Any close relative of any person referred to in subparagraph (A).

(E) Any person of whom any person referred to in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, is a director or officer.

(F) Any person in whom any person referred to in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, or any combination of persons acting in concert owns or controls, directly or indirectly, a 10-percent or greater equity interest.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, any person who is in any of the relationships referred to in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (1) within six months before or after a licensee provides financing assistance shall be deemed to be in the relationship as of the date when the licensee provides the financing
 assistance.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, if a licensee, in order to protect its interests, designates any person to serve as a director of, officer of, or in any capacity in the management of, a small business firm to which the licensee provides financing assistance, the person shall not, on that account, be deemed to have any relationship with the small business firm. However, this paragraph shall not apply in any case where the person has, directly or indirectly, any other financial interest in the small business firm or where the person, at any time before the licensee provides the financing assistance, served as a director of, officer of, or in any other capacity in the management of, the small business firm for a period of 30 days or more.

(b) “Close relative” means ancestor, lineal descendant, brother or sister and lineal descendants of either, spouse,
 father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, or sister-in-law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 516, Sec. 14.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

28821.

(a) A licensee shall not provide financial or managerial assistance to, or for the benefit of, any person to the detriment of a small business firm or smaller business firm, the licensee, its shareholders, or partners. Unless a licensee obtains a prior written exemption from the commissioner for special instances in which providing financial assistance may further the purposes of this division despite presenting a conflict of interest, a licensee shall not directly or indirectly do any of the following:

(1) Provide financial assistance to any of the licensee’s associates.

(2) Provide financial assistance to an associate of another
 licensee, if one of the licensee’s associates has received or will receive any direct or indirect financial assistance or a commitment from that licensee or a third licensee, including financial assistance or commitments received under any understanding, agreement, or cross dealing, reciprocal or circular arrangement.

(3) Borrow money from any of the following:

(A) A small business firm or smaller business firm to which the licensee has provided financial assistance.

(B) An officer, director, or owner of at least a 10-percent equity interest in the business.

(C) A close relative of a person described in subparagraph (B).

(4) Provide financial assistance to a small business firm or smaller
 business firm to discharge an obligation to a licensee’s associate or to make other funds available to pay the obligation, except if the obligation is to an associate lending institution and is a line of credit or other obligation incurred in the normal course of business.

(5) Provide financial assistance to a small business firm or smaller business firm for the purpose of purchasing property from a licensee’s associate.

(b) Without the commissioner’s prior written approval, a licensee’s associates shall not, directly or indirectly, do either of the following:

(1) Borrow money from any person described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) Receive from a small business firm or smaller business firm any compensation in connection with any financial
 assistance a licensee provides or anything of value for procuring, attempting to procure, or influencing a licensee’s action with respect to that financial assistance.

(c) (1) Without the commissioner’s prior written approval, a licensee shall not provide financial assistance to any business in which the licensee’s associate has either a voting equity interest, or total equity interests, including potential interests, of at least 5 percent.

(2) If a licensee and its associate provide financial assistance to the same small business firm or smaller business firm, whether at the same time or different times, a licensee shall demonstrate to the commissioner’s satisfaction that the terms and conditions are, or were, fair and equitable to the licensee, taking into account any differences in the timing of each party’s financial transactions.

(3) Financial assistance that meets either of the following criteria is exempt from the prior approval requirement in paragraph (1) and shall be presumed to be fair and equitable to the licensee for the purposes of paragraph (2):

(A) The licensee’s associate is a lending institution that is providing financing under a credit facility in order to meet the operational needs of a small business firm or smaller business firm, and the terms of that financing are usual and customary.

(B) The licensee’s associate invests in the small business firm or smaller business firm on the same terms and conditions and at the same time as the licensee.

(d) To protect a licensee’s investment, a licensee may designate an associate to serve as an officer, director, or other
 participant in the management of a small business firm or smaller business firm. The licensee shall identify this associate in the licensee’s records maintained and made available for the commissioner’s review. Without the commissioner’s prior written approval, the associate shall not do any of the following:

(1) Have any other direct or indirect financial interest in the small business firm or smaller business firm that exceeds, or has the potential to exceed, 5 percent of the firm’s equity.

(2) Have served for more than 30 days as an officer, director, or other participant in the management of the small business firm or smaller business firm before the licensee provided the financial assistance.

(3) Receive any income or anything of value from the small business firm or smaller business firm unless it is for the
 licensee’s benefit, with the exception of director’s fees, expenses, and distributions based upon the associate’s ownership interest in the small business firm or smaller business firm.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 516, Sec. 14.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Criminal Penalties [28880. - 28881.]

28880.

Any person who willfully violates any provision under this chapter shall upon conviction be fined not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or be imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 50.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

28881.

Nothing in this division limits the power of the state to punish any person for any act which constitutes a crime under any statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Civil Penalties [28900. - 28901.]

28900.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any person has violated any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division, the commissioner may order the person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in that amount as the commissioner may specify. However, the amount of the civil penalty shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day for which the violation continues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28901.

The provisions of Section 28900 are additional to, and not alternative to, other provisions of this division which authorize the commissioner to issue orders or to take other action on account of a violation of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division. However, no person who has been finally convicted under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 28800) of this division on account of a violation of any provision of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 28800) shall be liable to pay a civil penalty under Section 28900 on account of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Miscellaneous Provisions [28950. - 28958.]

28950.

No provision of this division imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion of the commissioner, or any written interpretive opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that the rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28951.

(a) The commissioner may from time to time make, amend, and rescind the rules, forms, and orders that are necessary to carry out this law, and define any terms, whether or not used in this law, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with this law. For the purpose of rules, the commissioner may, among other things, classify persons within the commissioner’s jurisdiction and may prescribe different requirements for different classes. The commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, waive any requirement of any rule or form in situations where in his or her opinion the requirement is not necessary in the public interest.

(b) The commissioner may, by regulation or order, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions or for specified periods, exempt from the provisions of this division any person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, if the commissioner finds that action to be in the public interest and that the regulation of those persons or transactions is not necessary for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28952.

The commissioner may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28953.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28954.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28955.

Nothing in this law, shall impair, derogate, or otherwise affect the authority or powers of the commissioner under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Part 3 (commencing with Section 25000)) or the application of any provision thereof to any person or transaction subject thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28956.

If any provision of this division , or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this law that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this division are declared to be severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

28957.

Neither the commissioner nor any employee of the commissioner shall use any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner which is not public information for personal gain or benefit, nor shall the commissioner nor any employee of the commissioner engage in any securities transaction based on that information, even though public, if there has not been a sufficient period of time for the securities or commodity markets to assimilate that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28958.

(a) The program established by this division shall be supported from funds appropriated by the Legislature from the State Corporations Fund.

(b) The funds appropriated from the State Corporations Fund and made available for expenditure under subdivision (a) of this section shall come from fees collected under Section 28110, penalties collected under Sections 28880 and 28900, and securities application filing fees collected under subdivisions (e), (f), (h), and (i) of Section 25608 and notice filing fees collected under subdivision (a) of Section 25608.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 4. BUCKET SHOP LAW [29000. - 29201.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [29000. - 29008.]

29000.

Unless the provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29001.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association, either domestic or foreign, whether acting in his or her own right or as the officer, agent, servant, employee, correspondent, or representative of another or as trustee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29002.

(a) “Trustee” means a person executing a trust, as defined in this section.

(b) “Trust” means any voluntary trust expressly created by or declared in an instrument in writing, other than a will or a judicial writ, order, decree, or judgment, to carry on any business or to secure the payment or repayment of money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 820, Sec. 23.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------

29003.

“Contract” includes any agreement, trade, or transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29004.

“Securities” means all shares in any corporation or association or of trustees, bonds, coupons, scrip, rights, choses in action, and other evidences of debt or property and options for the purchase or sale thereof or of any right entitling the holder thereof to participate in profits or a division of assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29005.

“Commodities” means anything movable that is bought and sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29006.

“Bucket shop” means any room, office, store, building, or other place where any bucketing or bucket shopping contract is made or offered to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29007.

“Keeper” means any person owning, keeping, managing, operating, or promoting a bucket shop, or assisting to keep, manage, operate, or promote a bucket shop.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29008.

“Bucketing” or “bucket shopping” means any of the following:

(a) Making or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale of any securities or commodities, wherein both parties intend, or the keeper intends, that the contract shall be, or may be, terminated, closed, or settled according to or upon the basis of the public market quotations of prices made on any board of trade or exchange upon which the securities or commodities are dealt in, without a bona fide purchase or sale of the securities or commodities.

(b) Making or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale of any securities or commodities, wherein both parties intend, or the keeper intends, that the contract shall be, or may be, deemed terminated, closed, or settled when the public market quotations of prices for the securities or commodities named in the contract reach a certain figure without a bona fide purchase or sale of the securities or commodities.

(c) Making or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale of any securities or commodities, wherein both parties do not intend, or such keeper does not intend, the actual or bona fide receipt or delivery of the securities or commodities, but do intend, or the keeper does intend, a settlement of the contract based upon the differences in the public market quotations of prices at which the securities or commodities are or are asserted to be bought and sold. 

(d) The sale by a keeper of any security or commodity purchased by him for the account of or upon the order of another when the proceeds of the sale are not immediately credited by the keeper to the account of the other person and when a report or statement in writing of the sale is not rendered to the other person by the keeper on the next business day following the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Prohibited Activities [29100. - 29105.]

29100.

Any person who makes or offers to make any contract constituting bucketing under Section 29008, or who makes any sale constituting bucketing under Section 29008, or who is the keeper of any bucket shop, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29101.

Any person who communicates, receives, exhibits, or displays in any manner any statement of quotations of prices of any securities or commodities, with an intent to make, or to offer to make, or to aid in making or offering to make, any contract constituting bucketing under Section 29008 is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29102.
